District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-1419

Annual report.

Repealed.

Aug. 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-152, § 20, 41 DCR 4636
June 6, 1998, D.C. Law 12-115, § 2, 45 DCR 1957
Feb. 6, 2008, D.C. Law 17-108, § 207(c), 54 DCR 10993
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2082(j), 57 DCR 181

History

1981 Ed., § 2-4019.

Prior Codifications

For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 2082(j) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 2082(j) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).

Emergency Legislation